Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-2118
Diversity plan; contents; approval; report.

(1) Each learning community, together with its member school districts, shall develop a diversity plan to provide educational opportunities pursuant to sections 79-769 and 79-2110 in each subcouncil district designed to attract students from diverse backgrounds, which plan may be revised from time to time. The initial diversity plan shall be completed by December 31 of the year the initial learning community coordinating council for the learning community takes office. The goal of the diversity plan shall be to increase the socioeconomic diversity of enrollment at each grade level in each school building within the learning community.

(2) Each diversity plan for a learning community shall include specific provisions relating to each subcouncil district within such learning community. The specific provisions relating to each subcouncil district shall be approved by both the achievement subcouncil for such district and by the learning community coordinating council.

(3) The learning community coordinating council shall report electronically to the Education Committee of the Legislature on or before February 1 of each odd-numbered year on the diversity and changes in diversity at each grade level in each school building within the learning community and on the academic achievement for different demographic groups in each school building within the learning community.

Laws 2007, LB641, § 51;

Laws 2008, LB1154, § 26;

Laws 2009, LB392, § 19;

Laws 2012, LB782, § 163;

Laws 2013, LB410, § 16;

Laws 2021, LB528, § 47.